District of Columbia statutes.
29-1012.11

Statement of dissolution.

(a)

A limited cooperative association that has dissolved or is about to dissolve may deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of dissolution that states:

(1)

The name of the association;

(2)

The date the association dissolved or will dissolve; and

(3)

Any other information the association considers relevant.

(b)

A person shall have notice of a limited cooperative association’s dissolution on the later of:

(1)

Ninety days after a statement of dissolution is filed; or

(2)

The effective date stated in the statement of dissolution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1214 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.